Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.455

Reasonable grounds.

"Reasonable grounds," when used in the context of a law enforcement officer's decision to make an arrest, means probable cause.

[ 1995 c 332 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1995 c 332: See notes following RCW 46.20.308.